Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB664.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 19, 1996 (P.L.1478, No.190), entitled "An act relating to the recycling and reuse of waste tires; providing for the proper disposal of waste tires and the cleanup of stockpiled tires; authorizing investment tax credits for utilizing waste tires; providing remediation grants for the cleanup of tire piles and for pollution prevention programs for small business and households; establishing the Small Business and Household Pollution Prevention Program and management standards for small business hazardous waste; providing for a 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 household hazardous waste program and for grant programs; making appropriations; and making repeals," is amended by adding a section to read:Section 106.5. Replacement tires.(a) Mandatory recycling.--If an individual brings a vehicle to a business entity that sells tires to replace a waste tire from the vehicle with a new tire:(1) The business entity shall retain the waste tire for the purpose of recycling.(2) The individual may not remove the waste tire from the business entity or otherwise retain the waste tire.(b) Applicability.--(1) This section shall not apply to a tire that does not need to be replaced but simply needs to be patched or otherwise repaired.(2) This section shall apply to a tire that:(i) No longer meets safety inspection standards.(ii) The business entity believes will no longer meet safety inspection standards within the next three months.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Vehicle." As defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0664PN0804 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526